District of Columbia statutes.
7-2122

Information about emergency care.

(a)

The Department of Health, in collaboration with the Board of Medicine and the Board of Pharmacy, shall develop medically and factually accurate written information regarding prophylactic antibiotics for the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases and emergency contraception for the prevention of pregnancy due to sexual assault.

(b)

The Department of Health shall disseminate the written information produced pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to all hospitals in the District.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-346, § 3, 56 DCR 966

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2123.